el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Κτηνοτροφία > Συστήματα έξυπνης γεωργίας: Αυτόματοι τροφοδότες; Ψηφιακά συστήματα διαχείρισης νερού; Συστήματα παρακολούθησης κτηνοτροφίας
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 畜牧業 > 智慧農業系統: 自動餵食器; 數位水管理系統; 牲畜監控系統
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Criação de animais > Sistemas de agricultura inteligente: Alimentadores automáticos; Sistemas digitais de gestão da água; Sistemas de monitorização de gado
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Pecuária > Sistemas de agricultura inteligente: Comedouros automáticos; Sistemas digitais de gestão de água; Sistemas de monitoramento de gado
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Boskapsskötsel > Smarta jordbrukssystem: Automatiska matare; System för hantering av vattenhanteringssystem; System för övervakning av boskap
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 畜産 > スマート農業システム: 自動給餌器; デジタル水管理システム; 家畜監視システム
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > การเลี้ยงสัตว์ > ระบบเกษตรอัจฉริยะ: เครื่องป้อนอาหารอัตโนมัติ; ระบบการจัดการน้ำแบบดิจิทัล; ระบบติดตามปศุสัตว์
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Gyvulininkystė > Išmaniosios ūkininkavimo sistemos: Automatinė šėrimo įranga; Skaitmeninės vandens valdymo sistemos; Gyvulių stebėjimo sistemos
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 畜牧业 > 智慧农业系统: 自动喂食器; 数字化水资源管理系统; 牲畜监控系统
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Élevage > Systèmes agricoles intelligents: Alimentateurs automatiques; Systèmes numériques de gestion de l’eau; Systèmes de surveillance du bétail
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Živinoreja > Pametni kmetijski sistemi: Avtomatske krmilnice; Digitalni sistemi za upravljanje vode; Sistemi za spremljanje živine
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Stočarstvo > Pametni poljoprivredni sustavi: Automatizirane hranilice; Sustavi digitalnog upravljanja vodom; Sustavi za nadzor stoke
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Zootecnia > Sistemi intelligenti per l'allevamento: Distributori di cibo automatici; Sistemi digitali di gestione dell'acqua; Sistemi di monitoraggio del bestiame
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Животноводство > Системы смарт-ферм: Автоматические кормушки; Цифровые системы управления водой; Системы мониторинга скота
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Creșterea animalelor > Sisteme agricole inteligente: Dispozitive automate de hrănire; Sisteme digitale de gestionare a apei; Sisteme de monitorizare a animalelor de fermă
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 축산업 > 스마트 농업 시스템: 자동 공급기; 디지털 수자원 관리 시스템; 가축 모니터링 시스템
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Állattenyésztés > Intelligens gazdálkodási rendszerek: Automatizált etetők; Digitális vízgazdálkodási rendszerek; Állatállomány-felügyeleti rendszerek
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Hayvancılık > Akıllı Tarım Sistemleri: Otomatik Besleyiciler; Dijital Su Yönetim Sistemleri; Hayvancılık İzleme Sistemleri
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Karjatalous > Älyviljelyjärjestelmät: Automaattiset ruokintalaitteet; Digitaaliset vedenhallintajärjestelmät; Karjan seurantajärjestelmät
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Viehhaltung > Intelligente Landwirtschaftssysteme: Automatische Futterspender; Digitale Wassermanagementsysteme; Viehüberwachungssysteme
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Hodowla zwierząt > Inteligentne systemy rolnicze: Automaty paszowe; Cyfrowe systemy zarządzania wodą; Systemy monitorowania zwierząt gospodarskich
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Chăn nuôi > Hệ thống nông nghiệp thông minh: Máy cho ăn tự động; Hệ thống quản lý nước kỹ thuật số; Hệ thống giám sát chăn nuôi
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Animal Husbandry > Smart Farming Systems: Automated Feeders; Digital Water Management Systems; Livestock Monitoring Systems
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Животновъдство > Интелигентни земеделски системи: Автоматизирани хранилки; Цифрови системи за управление на водите; Системи за мониторинг на добитъка
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zootechnika > Systémy chytrého zemědělství: Automatická krmná zařízení; Digitální systémy pro hospodaření s vodou; Systémy pro monitorování hospodářských zvířat
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Veeteelt > Slimme landbouwsystemen: Geautomatiseerde voeders; Digitale waterbeheersystemen; Veebewakingssystemen
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Cría de animales > Sistemas de agricultura inteligente: Alimentadores automáticos; Sistemas digitales de gestión del agua; Sistemas de monitoreo de ganado
nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Husdyrhold > Smarte landbrukssystemer: Fôrautomater; Digitale vannhåndteringssystemer; Systemer for husdyrovervåking
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Husdyrbrug > Smarte landbrugssystemer: Automatiske foderautomater; Digitale vandstyringssystemer; Systemer til overvågning af husdyr
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Chov zvierat > Inteligentné poľnohospodárske systémy: Automatické kŕmidlá; Digitálne systémy na riadenie vody; Systémy na monitorovanie hospodárskych zvierat